Utah statutes.
76-10-912.   Legislative findings -- Purpose of act.
The legislature finds and determines that competition is fundamental to the
free market system and that the unrestrained interaction of competitive forces
will yield the best allocation of our economic resources, the lowest prices,
the highest quality and the greatest material progress, while at the same time
providing an environment conducive to the preservation of our democratic,
political and social institutions.
The purpose of this act is, therefore, to encourage free and open competition
in the interest of the general welfare and economy of this state by
prohibiting monopolistic and unfair trade practices, combinations and
conspiracies in restraint of trade or commerce and by providing adequate
penalties for the enforcement of its provisions.
